Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.900

Severability—1951 c 43.

If any section, subsection, paragraph or provision of this chapter shall be held invalid by any court for any reason, such invalidity shall not in any way affect the validity of the remainder of this chapter.

[ 1951 c 43 s 16.]